Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-502
Liability; determination of applicable law.

The liabilities of the parties to any such contract shall in all other respects be governed either by the law applicable to lessor and lessee or the law applicable to bailor and bailee, whichever basis is stipulated in the contract between the owner of the safety deposit box and the user or customer thereof.

Laws 1941, c. 8, § 2, p. 78;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-802;

R.S.1943, § 8-502.